Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1916
Limited radiographer; requirements; specific anatomical region.

(1) A person licensed by the department, with the recommendation of the board, as a limited radiographer may practice medical radiography on limited regions of the human anatomy, using only routine radiographic procedures, for the interpretation by and under the direction of a licensed practitioner, excluding computed tomography, the use of contrast media, and the use of fluoroscopic or mammographic equipment. An applicant for a license as a limited radiographer shall successfully complete an examination approved by the board, as described in subdivision (2)(a) of section 38-1918 and at least one of the anatomical regions listed in subdivision (2)(b) of such section or successfully complete an examination approved by the department, as described in subsection (3) of section 38-1918.

(2) Each license issued shall be specific to the anatomical region or regions for which the applicant has passed an approved examination, except that an applicant may be licensed in the anatomical region of Abdomen upon successful passage of the examinations described in subdivisions (2)(a) and (2)(b)(iv) of section 38-1918 and upon a finding by the department, with the recommendation of the board, that continued provision of service for a community would be in jeopardy.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 654.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.